test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tuulda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tūlda: # Verb 11 'eng /est tulla/fin' - full paradigm
     tūlda+V+Inf: tūlda
     tūlda+V+Ger: tuldsõ
     tūlda+V+Sup: [tuʼlmõ, tulmõ]
     tūlda+V+Sup+Ine: [tuʼlmõõs, tulmõõs]
     tūlda+V+Sup+Ela: [tuʼlmõõst, tulmõõst]
     tūlda+V+Sup+Tra: [tuʼlmõõks, tulmõõks]
     tūlda+V+Sup+Abe: [tuʼlmõõt, tulmõõt]
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulāb
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tuʼltõ, tultõ]
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tulābõd
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tuʼļ, tuļ]
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tuʼļtõ, tuļtõ]
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tuʼļtõ, tuļtõ]
     tūlda+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [tuʼl, tul]
     tūlda+V+Cond+Sg3: tulks
     tūlda+V+Imprt+Sg2: [tuʼl, tul]
     tūlda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [tuʼl, tul]
     tūlda+V+Imprt+Pl2: tulgid
     tūlda+V+Jus+Sg3: tulgõ
     tūlda+V+QuoSg3: tuļļi
     tūlda+V+ActPrfPrc: tund
     tūlda+V+PssPrfPrc: tuldõd
